Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2370YH (1) 91 cm/ns H.F. 454 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âJury Fair Compensation Improvement Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 607A.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 1. A grand juror and a petit juror in all courts shall 5 receive thirty sixty dollars as compensation for each dayâs 6 service or attendance, including attendance required for the 7 purpose of being considered for service. The supreme court may 8 adopt rules that allow additional compensation for jurors whose 9 attendance and service exceeds seven days. 10